tools/hyphenators/se_hyph.tex
.ad1i
.ađa1
.afi1
.ag2
.aid1
.ai1s
.ak1
.akk1
.al2o
.amma3
.an1a
.an1á1
.and1
.ani1
.ao1
.ap2o
.ap2r
.ara1
.as1i
.as3ta
.at2r
.att1
.álá1
.árá2
.ás3ka
.ás3ta
.bá1b
.bá1ž
.bbl1
.cas1
.cat2
.cá3bu
.cá3m
.cás1
.ce1m
.co3li
.co1s
.ča1b
.ča3g
.ča1n
.čis1
.čo3li
.čo1m
.daa1
.da3me
.da3ni
.dan3v
.da2s
.dá2l
.dá1n
.dá1ž
.di1g
.di1s
.djo1
.dna1
.do3mi
.do3sa
.dyr1
.då1
.ebe2
.ec1
.eid1
.eks1
.ert1
.eu1
.fa3se
.fá3ri
.fo1a
.gaa1
.ga3le
.ga3si
.ga1ž
.gá1j
.ger1
.gi3na
.gs2
.gs1ž
.he3de
.her1
.hs1
.hta1
.hus1
.ia2
.ib1
.id1j
.id1n
.ido1
.ii1s
.iko1
.ill1
.ilo1
.im1
.imá2
.imp1
.ing1
.ir1d
.is3ka
.is2t
.it1á
.it2r
.jag1
.ja3li
.ja1m
.jar1
.jád1
.jer1
.jod1
.jsl1
.kal1
.ka3su
.ká3ri
.ke1l
.ki1l
.klp1
.ko1d
.kol1
.ko1r
.krá1
.ku3la
.kva1
.la3ba
.la3sa
.la3si
.la3su
.lá1r
.lc1
.ld1i
.lei1
.le3ra
.lip1
.ll2
.lód1
.maá1
.mal1
.man1
.ma3na
.ma3ši
.má3ši
.md2g
.me2a
.med1
.mei1
.mi3hu
.mk2
.mmá1
.mod1
.mo3sa
.mp1a
.mpá1
.na3si
.na2v
.ná2
.ná1r
.náv1
.neg1
.ng2
.ngo2
.nm2
.nma1
.nn2
.no3m
.nt1a
.nt2ž
.ŋg2
.ob1
.og1
.ogs1
.ok1
.ome2
.on1s
.op1
.or3ie
.os1
.osá1
.otá1
.oyá1
.pa3g
.pa1š
.pe2
.pe1d
.per1
.pe1t
.po3li
.pst1
.ra3ke
.re1g
.re3pr
.re1s
.rg2
.rga1
.rgs1
.roá1
.ros1
.ru3ba
.rus1
.sa1r
.sa2s
.sá3ri
.si1o
.sjs1
.sk2
.ski3b
.sm1ž
.st2
.sui2
.sur1
.ša3lu
.ši3ra
.ško1
.šo1g
.ta3t
.ti1b
.til1
.to1n
.to1t
.tra1
.ttá1
.tud1
.tu3m
.tun2
.tva1
.tv1á2
.ŧáf1
.ubá1
.ue1
.ug1
.ui1d
.ula1
.umu1
.uo1
.ur3ta
.ust1
.uvá1
.vá1b
.vb2
.vd'1
.ve3li
.ves2
.vi3ha
.vk1
.vmá1
.vr1i
.vs1
.xa2
.xt2
.yd1
.ys1k
.zel1
.æs2
.øi1
.øst1
.åk1
a1a
aaga1
aal1
aa1m
aa2n1
a2ar
1a2as
a2at
aa1v
a1á2
aái1
a1b
aba1d
aba2g
1abai
abá1l
2abb
abbá2
1abc
a1be
a2beh
abe1l
a2b1m
abo1l
abt1
a2bui
ab1un2
a2buž
ab1ž
2ac
acár1
ace1b
ac1h
ac1`
2a2č
a1ç
2ad
a1dad
a2dao
a2dat
a2d1av
adá1
adá1ž
addá2
adde1
addu1
a1dem
aden2
a2dii
a2din
a2div
a2d1j
adjá1
adjo1
admi1
a2d1n
adni1
adno2
adnu1
a2dr
a2duv
1adv
ad1ž
ađe2
ađi2
a2đo
2a2e1
a1ea
aeas1
a1e1d
a2ei
aei2n
aek1
aeks2
aeli1
a2em
a1er
aes1
aesk2
a1eu
a1ev
a1é
2a1f
afa1
afi1n
a2fr
af1s
af1ž
af`á1
2a1g
a2gač
a2gag
a2gam
a2ga1n
a2gao
aga2r
aga3sa
aga3si
a2gav
aga1ž
a2geb
age2n
a2geš
a2get
age3ži
agga2
aggu2
agi3er
agii1
agi1n
a2gis
a1g2l
ag2no
a2g1r
agrá1
a2gut
a2guv
a1gü
ag2v
a2gå
2ah
a1hal
a3hala
ahan1
a1har
a1hav
2ahá
ahča1
a1hed
a2hem
a2het
2a2hi
ahka1
ahká2
ahki1
2a1ho
ahpa1
ahtá1
a2huv
a2i
ai2a2
ai1b2
ai1c
a2id
aide1
aid1n
ai2do
ai1e
ai1g
ai1gŋ
ai1go1
aiia2
a1iie
a1ij
ai1la
aila3s
ai1le
ai1li
ailø1
a2in.
a1ind
a2ine
ai1no
a1ip
ai1r
a2i1sa1
ai2si
1ait
2aitb
2aitd
aiti1
2aits
aive1
aivi1
2a1j
aja2
ajá2
ajd1
ajes3
aji1b
ajje2
a2k
a1ka
aka1d
aka1m
ak1ád
akca2
2ake
ake2m
a1ki
akká2
akki1
ak2l
akŋa1
a1ko
ak1r
ak2rá
aksa2
aksá1
aks2t
akto1
a1ku1
1akv
2a1la
a2lab
ala1d
a2l1ag
al1ak
a2lam
a2lao
a1lá
al1áh
alá2l
alá2m
1alár
alás1
albo1
al1c
al1č
al1d
al3duh
al3dut
a2lep
ale1s
1alf1
2ali
ali1h
a1li2m
alip1
a1lis
a2l1j
alká1
1alku
1alm
al1oa
alo1b
al1p
al1s
alta1
al1tr
alut1
2aly
al2z
2am
1a2ma.
a2mab
a2mag
amai1
a2mam
ama1n
amá1
a2mái
2amb
ambe1
am1br
2amd
2ame
a2mea
ame1b
ame1d
ame1l
2amh
ami1b
amii1
amii3d
amis2
1amk
aml1á
amln1
1amm
am2na
1amne
2am2o
ampo3l
2ams
am1t
am2ta
amus1
am1ž
a1mä
a1nad
a1nag
a2nal
an1ar
a1nas
ana3sa
an3ask
aná1d
a2n1áj
aná2r
ance2
1anču
anda1
anda3l
a1ne.
a1ne2l
a2nen
a1nes
a1neš
a1net
an2ga
a1ni.
a2nii
a2n1j
anja2
an2ju
anla1
2ann
anná2
an2nj
ano2v
an1s
ansi1
an2sk
an3sta
anš1
anti1
1an2tr
anu1m
aŋga1
aŋká2
aŋŋa1
a1o
ao2a
aoi1
aois2
ao1li
ao1si
aos1t
aote1
1ap
apa1
apa1n
ap1as
aper2
a2pl
apma3h
apmá1
ap2o
ap1oa
appo3h
a1pr
apro1
a1psy
apul2
ap1ž
ap´á1
2a1q
a1ra
a3rad
ara2l
aran1
a1r2á
ará2d
arba1
arca1
ar1da
ar3ded
a1reb
are3li
a1re2n2
a1rer
arga1
aria2
a3r1ih
ari1o
ariu2
arja1
arka1
1arki
arla1
ar2o
ar1oa1
aro2n
arra2
arri1
ar1sk
ar1ta
artá1
a3ru
a1sa
asag1
a2sai
a2sal
a1sas2
asa3sa
asá2
a2s1ád
asá3l
asán2
as1ek
ase1l
asgá1
as3ha
as1he
as1hi
asia2
asi2l
a2siš
as1j
a2sk
2aska
as1ki
as3kot
a1sku
2asm
asma2
asmme3
as2mu
as2nu
1as2pi
as3ta.
as3tao
as3tar
a3staš
astá2
as3tás
asti3l
a2s1tu
asu2
a1suv
as1ž
as1´s
2a2š
aš1ah
aša1s
a1šá
aš1áh
aš1e
aška2
aš1l
a1šoh
aššá1
aš2te
aš2ti
aš1tu
a1šu
a2šuh
ašun1
a2šus
a2šut
a2t1
a1ta
ata2r
at2a1s
atá2
at1ál
atá1n
a1tár
ate3g
ate1l
at1ev
at3h
atha1
atib1
ati1g
atio1
atit1
atni2
a2toi
ato1s
a2tr
ats2k
attá2
atte1
a1tu1
atvá1
at'á1
at2`
a2u
au1b
1au1d
au2e
1auf
aufá1
1augi
a1uhe
au1l
au2la
aul2t
au2n2
aup1
au1sa
au1š
aušu1
1auti
auto1
a1uv
auva1
avah1
avat2
a1ve
aven2
avi2d
2aviđ
avi1h
1avii
a1vir
avi2s
1avit
a1ví
avla1
av2n
avva2
a1vå2
avåg1
a1w2
a2wai
a1x1
a2xe
a1y
ay2a
ayam1
2az2
azi1
a1zo1
a2ža.
a2žab
a2žan
aža3sa
a2žaš
a2žat
a2žaž
a1ži
a1žo
až2žá
a1æ
a1ø
a1å2
aår1
2a2'2
a2'á
a1'b
a1'e
a1's
2a2´
a´á1r
a2`
a1`n
á1a
áai1d
á1á
á1áh
á1áš
á1b
ába1
ábá2
ábba1
ábbe1
ábbo1
ábbu1
á1be
ábe1b
á2be1h
ábe2l
ábe2n
ábe1s
á2b1m
ábma1
ábmá1
ábmo2
áb2o2
ábo1l
ábor2
áb1ž
ácci1
á2čá1
ádá2
ádda2
ádde2
áde1
áde1a
á1deh
áde1n
á2det
ádi2
á2din
á2dit
á2div
á2d1j
ádjá1
ádju2
ád1n
ád2r
á1dus1
á2duv
áđa1
áđá2
áđe2
áđi1b
áđo2
á1e
2áf
áfa1
áfas2
á1fe
áfi2
áfmá1
áfo2
áfrá2
á1g
ágaá1
ága2l
ágá2n
ágá1ž
áge2n
áges2
áge1ž
ági3d
á2gin
á2gå
á2had
á1hag
á1hah
á2ham
áhce1
1áhč
1áhká
áhpi1
áhte1
á1hus
1á2i
ái1b2m
ái1bu
á2id
áide1
ái1d2n
ái2do
ái3duv
áigi1
2ái1h
ái1la
á1ilb
ái1li
ái1lu
2áim
ái1n
áipa1
1áir
ái1ro
ái1s
ái1sa
áisá1
á1isg
áis2t
ái3stá
ái1tá
áiva1
á1j
á3ja
ája2g1
á1já
áje2
á1ji
áj1il
á3jo2
áj1ov
á1ju1
á2jå
á2k1
á1ka1
ákči1
ákka2
ákká3h
1ákŋ
ák1r
1áksá
1áksi
1ákš
áktá1
1ákti
ákto2
á1la
á3lah
á3lá
álá1l
álá2s
1álb
ál1di
ál3din
á2le.
á1le1k
á1lem
á1leš
á2let
1álg
áli1d
álii1
áli2s
á2lit
ál1j
2áll
állá2
álle1
álli2
állo1
ál1oa
álo1b
álo2n
1ált
á1lum
á1lup
á1lus
á1luv
álvi2
2ám
áma1
ám1ab
áma2g
ám1ah
ámá2h
ámá2l
ámá2n
á2me.
á1mea
á2met
ám2i
ámi1b
ámi2d
ámi1t2
ámo2n
ámot2
ámpe1
ámt1
á1mu1
ámu1b
á2my
ám1ž
á1na
á3nač
ána1l
án1ao
á2n2á
áná2l
ánda1
á1ne1b
á1neg
áneh1
á1ne1j
á1nek
á1nel
á1ne2m
á1ne2n
á1nes
á1neš
á1než
ánge1
án2gu
á1nii1
á2nis
án1j
á2no
ánse2
ánto1
ánu1h
áŋa1h
á1ŋe
áŋi1
á1o
á1ò
2áp1
ápmá2
ápme1
áppo1
á1pr
á1ra
ára2b
á2ra2d
á2ra2l
áram1
áran1
á2rap
ára3sa
á2rá
ár1ád
árá1h
ár1d
ár1di
ár2do
ár1du
áre1g
á1res
árga2
ári2
1ária
á2rin
á2ris2
árko1
árle1
á1ro
ár1oa
árre1
árre3h
árro3h
árš1
ár1ta
á2ru1
árus2
1árv
á2ry
á1s2a
á1sag
ása2l
ása2m1
á1sas2
á1saž
á2se
á1seh
á1sem
á1seš
á1sež
ás1h
1ásia
ásie1
ási1h
á1sin
ásis2
ásit1
á2sk
ás3kan
ás1ki
ás1ko
ás3kun
ás3kuv
1ásl
ás2mu
áso1
1ásod
ás1om
áso2n
á2st
ás3ta.
ás3tah
ás3tar
ástá1
ás2tu
ás3tus
ás3tuv
ás1uv
1á2š
á1ša
á2šam
áš1e
á1šen
2áši
áška1
2ášm
ášša2
áššo1
áš1t
ášu1b
á1šut
2á2t1
á1tá1r
át1h
átne1
átnu1
á2t1o
áto1s
á2tr
áttá2
átti2
á1ŧ
á1u
áva1ž
ávár1
ávás2
1ávč
ávdá2
á1ve
á1vi2
ávis2
áv2ku
ávpá1
1ávs
2á1ž
áža1s
á2že
á2ži
á1žo
á1å
á2'1
á'a1
á1´á
ã1oi
ã1ol
ã1on
1b2a
ba2a
1ba1b
ba2ba
1bac
1bad
ba2de
ba1e
1bag
ba3ga
bagh1
1ba1h
1bai2
baid1
1baj
1bak
1bal
bali1
1ba1m
1ban
b1and
bani1
ba2nu
1bar
1bas
ba2se
2basr
1ba2š
1bat
1bav
1baž
ba1ža
1b2á
bá1da
bá1di
bá1du
bá1go
báh1
bá1je
bá2ji
bá2nu
b1árá
bá2r1e
bá2ri
b1árl
bá1sa
bá1si
bás3ki
bá1z
bázo1
bá1ža
2b1b
b3ba
bba2s
bbá1g
bbá2n
bbá2s
bbes2
bble2
b2b1oa
bbo2s2
bb2r
b3bu1
bbu2g
bbu2l
bbus2
bby1
2bc
b1cp
bc1ž
2b2d1
bd2m
b2dr
bd1ž
1b2e
1be.
2be1ah
1beai
be1ak
1beal
be1b
1bec
2beču
1bed
be1di
be1g
be2gi
1beha
be3has
1behi
1bei
bek1
beki1
1bel
be3lač
be3laž
bele1
be3leb
be3lii
bello3
be2ma
be2mo
1beo
be1p
1ber
ber2g
1bes
be3sii
1beš
1bet
beth1
1bev
b1f
b2fd
bfs1
2b1g
bgen1
2bh2
bh1a
b2hal
bhu1
bh1´a
1b2i
bib1m
bid1
bi2e
biid1
bi1li
bi2me
bi1ne
bing2
bin1j
2binl
bi1oh
bi1ro
bi2se
bi2si
bis2t
bi1tá
bi`á1
b1í
b2j
2bk
bki1
b1kj
2bl
b1la
b2laš
bl1d
b1le
b3le.
blei2
bl2g
b1li
blo1
b2l1u1
b2l1y
b2l1æ
bm2
bma1
bma1b
bma2h
b2man
bmá2b
bmb2
b1me
bme2m
bme2n
bme1s2
bmil2
bmi3la
bmi1s2
bmo2
bmo1a
bmos2
b2mov
bmui1
bmu2m
2b2n2
bnp1
b1nš1
1b2o
bo2ga
bo2gi
bo2k
bo2kl
b2ol
bo3lač
bo3laš
bo3laž
b2om
bo2ma
bo3net
bon1j
bor2g
b1ori
boru1
bos1
bo3sas
bo2se
b2ou1
box2
bozos3
2b1p
bpi1
bp2n
bpo1
1bq1
2b1r2
2bra
bra1d
bra2l
brat2
brii1
br2j
1b2ro
brp1
b2rå
2bs2
1bs2á1
b1se
b1si
b1s2k
bs1t2
b1s2ti
b1su
b1š
b2t
btá1
bt2b
bt1e
bt2nj
bt2ž
bt1`e
bt1`g
1bu
bu2d
1buđ
bu1go
1buh
1buk
1bul
bul1m
bu1m
bu2ma
bu2mi
bu2mo
1buo
bur1t
bu1s
1bu1si
1busk
1busv
1buv
2b1v2
b1w
2b1x
1by
by1h
by2n
byna1
by1o
b1z
2bž
b1ža
b2ä
1bø
bør1
bø1t
1bö
bå2
2b2'
b1'n
2b´
2b2`
b2`a
b`ár1
b1`b
b1`d
b1`n
1ca
cag2
ca2gi
ca1h
ca3hal
caid1
ca1l
cala2
ca2m
ca2mo
ca2n
ca1na
c1ans
can1v
ca2sa
ca2se
ca2si
cas2t
c1ath
cavi1
1c2á
cá1di
cá1ha
cá3had
cáia2
cá2j
cá2l
cá1n
cá1r
cá1ri
cás2k
cá1z
c1b2
c2be1
cbs1i
2c1c2
cca1
cca2l
cce1b
cci1n
cco2d
c2cr
ccu2m
cd1a
cdá1r
cdá3si
cd2b
cdbe1
c1de
cd1o
cd1´á
cd1`b
1c2e
ce2ma
ce2mo
cena1
ce1si
ce2su
cey1
1cf
c1g
cga1n
c2ge
cg2n
c2go1
cgx1
c1h
c2ha
chei2
ch2g
ch1k
ch2l
c2h2m
ch1n
c1ho
ch1oa
chon2
ch2r
c1hu
1c2i
ci1be
ci2b1m
ci1d
ci2de
ci2k
cili1
ci2n
ci2r
ci2si
cis2t
ci2t
city1
c1í
c1k
c3ka
ckar2
cká2
c3ki
ck1j
c2k1l
ck2li
c2kn
c2k1oa
c2k2r
ckri1
c2l
c2lo
c1m
cmp1
cm1s
cn2
c1ne2
1co
2c1oa
coa1g
coá2
coár1
co1d
co3dat
co2du
c2oh
c2om
co2ma
co2mi
con1
core2
cos1
cos2t
cot2t
co1´a
co1`d
cpi1
cpos2
c1q
c2r2
c1ra2
1c1re
crna2
c1ro
c2s2
c2sa
csas1
csár1
cs1k
csš1
c1st
cs1ž
c1š
2c1t
ct2h
c2tii
ctio2
c2to
ctob1
c2tr
ct1`
c1þ
1c2u
cu2d
cui1
cu2l
cu1m
cu2me
cu2mo
cus2t
cuta2
1c1v
cv1á
cv1'á
1cw
2cwi
c1x1
1c2y
cya1
c1z
cæ1
c1å2
2c2'
c2'a
c2'á1
c1'h
c1'm
c1's
2c2´
c´á2
c´ár1
2c`2
c1`al
c1`s
1ča
čabe1
ča2d
ča3dal
ča1h
čahá1
čai1
čaid2
ča3luv
ča1m
ča2ma
ča1n2j
čan1v
ča2sa
ča2sk
čava1
1č2á
čá1ba
čái1
čá3le.
čá1lu
čá1m
čá2ma
č1á2r
čáv1
č1b
2č1č2
ččá1
ččá2l
čče1b
ččo1b
1če
čea1b
če3jed
če2ma
če1še
če2šu
čeža1
1či
či2b
či1be
či2h
či3lao
či3lat
či1no
či3ra.
či2ri
či2s
čis2t
1č2o
čo2a
2čoi
čo2mo
čo2n
čo2re
čo2ri
čo1ro
čort1
čos1
čos2t
1čs
čto1
1ču
ču1be
ču2li
ču2m
ču2mo
ču1sa
ču1se
čus2t
č1ž
1ça
1d2a
daa1r
1dac
da3dan
1dade
da3dea
1dag
1d2ah
da3hal
da3he.
1dai
da1in
da1is
1daj
1dak1
daka1
1dale2
2dall
1dame
1dami
dam2l
da2n1
1dana
1daná
3danba
1dand
1dane
1danh
1dani
1dank
1danl
2dan1o
dano3l
2danv
3danvá
1dao
2dap
1da2r
dara1
dar1g
1da1s
da1sa
dasá1
da2sk
das1t
1daš
da1še
da3šea
1datb
1datk
1datl
1datm
1datp
2datt
1datv
1dav
1daž
da'á1
1dá
dáai1
dá1bu
dá1d
dá1du
dága1
dá1hu
dá1j
dál3da
dán1
dá2n1á
dá1ne
dá3nin
dá2nu
d2ár
dá2ra
dás1
dásá1
dá3sus
dá1ša
d1ávi
dá1ž
2d1b2
d2b1á1
db2r
dbs1i
d2by
db1ž
d1c
2d1č
2d1d2
dda1d
dda1h
dda2s1
dda2š
ddá1h
ddái1
ddá1l
ddá1m
ddá2n
ddá1s
dde1a
dde1b
dde3mu
ddet1
ddi2d
ddii1
d2dir
ddi2s
ddit1
dd2j
d2dn
d2d1oa
ddo2n1
ddos1
ddu1h
ddus2
1d2e
2dea
de1ab
de1ah
3deaj
de1am
de3ati
de1b
de2ba
1debe1
1dede
1dee
de1f
de1g
de1h
1dehe
1deik
1dej
1dek
dek3s
1del
dela1
1deme
de2mo
1demu
1den
de1n2j
1deo
2dep
1der
dere1
derg1
de2ru
de1s
des2a
1desi
de2so
de1st
de2t
1deta
1detá
1detb
det2l
2detn
de1t2r
2dett
1dev
2df
df1an
df2m
2d1g
dgá1
dg1u
dgud1
d1ha
dha2m
dha2n1
d1he
d1ho
d1hu
1di
1di.
1d2ia
1diá1
1di2b
dib1m
di3bui
1dic
did1
di2di
didš1
1diđ
2di2e
1dif
1dig
1dih
d2ii
diia2
1diij
1diim
dii1s2
1dik
1dil
dili1
dill1
di3luv
1dim
di2ma
1dina
1diná
1dine
1ding
1dini
1dio
di1od
di1ok
di2ol
dio2n
di2os
dip1
1dir
dir1d
di1ri
1dise
1disk
1dism
dis2t
2diš
d1ita
1dite
d1itn
1divš
di1'á
di1's
d1ja
djá2l
djá2n
djás2
2djáv
d1je1
dje1g
djis2
djo1h
djo2m
djo2n
djo1s
dju1b
dju2l
d1k2
dkr1
dkt1
2d2l
dlas1
dlá1r
dl2g
d2lj
dlæ1
2d1m
dma2l
dmi1n
dmur1
dn2
dn2a
2dna.
1dna1g
2dnai
d2nal
dnan1
1dnao
dna1s
1d2nat
dn2á1
dnán1
dnb1
dne1
dne2m
dng2
2dnh
dnia2
dni1d
dni1m
dni2n
dni1s2
d1n2j
1dnm
d1no
2dno.
dno2d
dno1l
dno1s2
2dnu
dnu1b
d2nug
d2nul
dnu1n
dn1ø
1do
2d1oah
doba2
2doe
do2la1
2d1olg
do2mo
d2on
do2na
d1op
do2r
do3sao
do3saž
dos2t
dot2t
3dovi
1dó
d1ò
2d1p2
dpsa1
d1r2
drat2
drau1
dre1g
d2res
dret2
driv1
d2rop1
2ds2
d1sa
d2s1as
d1sf
dsfo1
d1si
dsig1
ds2j
d1s2k
d1s2p
d1st2
ds1`a
d1š
2d2t2
dtvá1
1du
1du.
1dub
du1be
1duc
1due
1dug2
1d2ui
1duk
1dul
du1me
1dumo
1dun
1duo
2dup
1dur
du2ri
1du1sa
1dusb
1duse
1dusg
1dusj
1dusk
1dusm
1duso
1duss
1dusv
3duš
1dutk
1duva
3duvva
3duvvá
2d1v2
d2va
dvdi1
dvi2g
d1w2
1dy
d1yl
dy1n
dyt2
2d2z
dza1
2dž
d1æs
d1ä
døle1
d1øy
d1å
dår1d
2d'
d'á1
d1'g
d1's
2d´
d1´b
d1´g
d1´n
d2´s
2d`
d1`g
d2`h
1đa
đa1b
đa1d
đa1h
đai1
đak1
đa2l2
đal1d
đa2le
đa2mi
đa2mo
đa1mu
đa2n
đa1r
đa2s
đas2t
đaš1t
1đ2á1
đá2b
đá2ha
đá2j
